Ohio, session 136, HB480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 122.58, 169.01, 169.02, 169.03, 7
169.05, 169.06, 169.07, 169.08, 169.09, 169.12, 169.16, 169.99, 8
and 5703.21 be amended and sections 169.091, 169.18, 169.19, and 9
169.20 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 10
Sec. 122.58. Moneys in the funds established pursuant to 11
Chapter 122. of the Revised Code, except as otherwise provided 12
in any proceedings authorizing revenue bonds or in any trust 13
agreement securing such bonds, in excess of current needs, may 14
be invested in notes, bonds, or other obligations which are 15
direct obligations of or are guaranteed by the United States, or 16
in certificates of deposit or other withdrawable accounts of 17
banks, trust companies, and or building and loan or savings and 18
loan associations organized under the laws of the state or the 19

H. B. No. 480 Page 2
As Introduced
United States, or in the manner provided in any agreement 20
entered into pursuant to section 169.05 of the Revised Code. 21
Income from all such investments of moneys in any fund 22
shall be credited to such funds as the director of development 23
determines subject to the provisions of any bond issuance 24
proceedings or trust agreement, and such investments may be sold 25
at such time as the director shall determine, provided 26
certificates of deposit or other withdrawable accounts may be 27
sold only in accordance with division (B) of section 169.05 or 28
divisions division (E) and (F) of section 169.08 of the Revised 29
Code. 30
Sec. 169.01. As used in this chapter, unless the context 31
otherwise requires: 32
(A) "Financial organization" means any bank, trust 33
company, savings bank, safe deposit company, mutual savings bank 34
without mutual stock, savings and loan association, credit 35
union, or investment company. 36
(B)(1) "Unclaimed funds" means any moneys, or rights to 37
moneys with a value of twenty-five dollars or more in total for 38
a particular owner, virtual currency, or other intangible 39
property, as described in section 169.02 of the Revised Code, 40
when, as shown by the records of the holder, the owner has not, 41
within the times provided in section 169.02 of the Revised Code, 42
done any of the following: 43
(a) Increased, decreased, or adjusted the amount of such 44
funds; 45
(b) Assigned, paid premiums, or encumbered such funds; 46
(c) Presented an appropriate record for the crediting of 47
such funds or received payment of such funds by check, draft, or 48

H. B. No. 480 Page 3
As Introduced
otherwise; 49
(d) Corresponded with the holder concerning such funds; 50
(e) Otherwise indicated an interest in or knowledge of 51
such funds; 52
(f) Transacted business with the holder. 53
(2) "Unclaimed funds" does not include any of the 54
following: 55
(a) Money received or collected under section 9.39 of the 56
Revised Code; 57
(b) Any payment or credit due to a business association 58
from a business association representing sums payable to 59
suppliers, or payment for services rendered, in the course of 60
business, including, but not limited to, checks or memoranda, 61
overpayments, unidentified remittances, nonrefunded overcharges, 62
discounts, refunds, and rebates; 63
(c) Any payment or credit received by a business 64
association from a business association for tangible goods sold, 65
or services performed, in the course of business, including, but 66
not limited to, checks or memoranda, overpayments, unidentified 67
remittances, nonrefunded overcharges, discounts, refunds, and 68
rebates; 69
(d) Either of the following: 70
(i) Any credit or obligation due a retail customer that is 71
represented by a gift certificate, gift card, merchandise 72
credit, or merchandise credit card, redeemable only for goods or 73
services, including gift cards issued by financial organizations 74
or business associations; 75

H. B. No. 480 Page 4
As Introduced
(ii) Any electronic payment device that is issued by a 76
financial organization or a business association that has no 77
expiration date and meets all of the following conditions: 78
(I) It is purchased or loaded on a prepaid basis for the 79
future purchase or delivery of goods or services. 80
(II) It is redeemable upon presentation to a single 81
merchant or service provider or an affiliated group of merchants 82
or service providers. 83
(III) It is not redeemable for cash in whole or in part. 84
(e) Any open-loop prepaid card that is issued by a 85
financial organization or a business association for which the 86
underlying funds do not expire. For purposes of division (B)(2) 87
(e) of this section, "open-loop prepaid card" means an 88
electronic payment device that meets all of the following 89
conditions: 90
(i) It is purchased or loaded on a prepaid basis for the 91
future purchase or delivery of any goods or services. 92
(ii) It can be used to purchase goods and services at 93
multiple unaffiliated merchants or service providers. 94
(iii) It is not redeemable for cash in whole or in part. 95
(f) Any rewards card. For purposes of division (B)(2)(f) 96
of this section, "rewards card" includes any loyalty, incentive, 97
or promotional type program that is issued by a financial 98
organization or a business association whether represented by a 99
card or electronic record, which program is established for the 100
purposes of providing cardholder awards, rewards, rebates, or 101
other amounts to reward the cardholder for the cardholder's 102
relationship with the entity sponsoring the rewards card, 103

H. B. No. 480 Page 5
As Introduced
provided that no direct money was paid by the cardholder for the 104
rewards card. "Rewards card" includes both of the following: 105
(i) Cards or electronic records consisting of points, 106
cash, or other tokens of value given to a cardholder as a reward 107
or incentive for engaging in a transaction or a series of 108
transactions; 109
(ii) The unpaid portion of a rewards card when the rewards 110
card is partially loaded by the cardholder with the remaining 111
portion funded as a reward or incentive. 112
A minimal annual fee charged to the cardholder for joining 113
any such loyalty, incentive, or promotional type program shall 114
not be considered direct money paid by the cardholder for the 115
rewards card. For purposes of division (B)(2)(f) of this 116
section, "cardholder" means the holder of a rewards card, 117
regardless of whether the rewards card is represented by a card 118
or by an electronic record. 119
(g) Money in a personal allowance account, as defined by 120
rules adopted by the medicaid director, up to and including the 121
maximum resource limitation, of a medicaid recipient who has 122
died after receiving care in a long-term care facility, and for 123
whom there is no identifiable heir or sponsor; 124
(h) Money in a demand or savings account at a holder that 125
is a bank, bank holding company, savings bank, savings 126
association, savings and loan holding company, mutual holding 127
company, credit union, or affiliate of any of the aforementioned 128
entities when the only activity on the account is one or more 129
recurring electronic debit or credit transfers, including 130
transfers made via automated clearing house, but not including 131
fees charged by the holder or automatic reinvestments of 132

H. B. No. 480 Page 6
As Introduced
dividends or interest; 133
(i) For purposes of division (B)(2) of this section, 134
"business association" means any corporation, joint venture, 135
business trust, limited liability company, partnership, 136
association, or other business entity composed of one or more 137
individuals, whether or not the entity is for profit. 138
(C) "Owner" means any person, or the person's legal 139
representative, entitled to receive or having a legal or 140
equitable interest in or claim against moneys, rights to moneys, 141
or other intangible property, subject to this chapter. 142
(D)(1) "Holder" means any person that has possession, 143
custody, or control of moneys, rights to moneys, or other 144
intangible property, or that is indebted to another, if any of 145
the following applies: 146
(a) Such person resides in this state; 147
(b) Such person is formed under the laws of this state; 148
(c) Such person is formed under the laws of the United 149
States and has an office or principal place of business in this 150
state; 151
(d) The records of such person indicate that the last 152
known address of the owner of such moneys, rights to moneys, or 153
other intangible property is in this state; 154
(e) The records of such person do not indicate the last 155
known address of the owner of the moneys, rights to moneys, or 156
other intangible property and the entity originating or issuing 157
the moneys, rights to moneys, or other intangible property in 158
this state or any political subdivision of this state, or is 159
incorporated, organized, created, or otherwise located in this 160

H. B. No. 480 Page 7
As Introduced
state. Division (D)(1)(e) of this section applies to all moneys, 161
rights to moneys, or other intangible property that is in the 162
possession, custody, or control of such person on or after July 163
22, 1994, whether the moneys, rights to moneys, or other 164
intangible property becomes unclaimed funds prior to or on or 165
after that date. 166
(2) "Holder" does not mean any hospital granted tax-exempt 167
status under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or 168
any hospital owned or operated by the state or by any political 169
subdivision. Any entity in order to be exempt from the 170
definition of "holder" pursuant to this division shall make a 171
reasonable, good-faith effort to contact the owner of the 172
unclaimed funds. 173
(E) "Person" includes a natural person; corporation, 174
whether for profit or not for profit; copartnership; 175
unincorporated nonprofit association; public authority; estate; 176
trust; two or more persons having a joint or common interest; 177
eleemosynary organization; fraternal or cooperative association; 178
other legal or community entity; the United States government, 179
including any district, territory, possession, officer, agency, 180
department, authority, instrumentality, board, bureau, or court; 181
or any state or political subdivision thereof, including any 182
officer, agency, board, bureau, commission, division, 183
department, authority, court, or instrumentality. 184
(F) "Mortgage funds" means the housing guarantee 185
development fund created by division (D) (A) of section 128.11 186
175.11 of the Revised Code. 187
(G) "Lawful claims" means any vested right a holder of 188
unclaimed funds has against the owner of such unclaimed funds. 189

H. B. No. 480 Page 8
As Introduced
(H) "Public utility" means any entity defined as such by 190
division (A) of section 745.01 or by section 4905.02 of the 191
Revised Code. 192
(I) "Deposit" means to place money in the custody of a 193
financial organization for the purpose of establishing an 194
income-bearing account by purchase or otherwise. 195
(J) "Income-bearing account" means a time or savings 196
account, whether or not evidenced by a certificate of deposit, 197
or an investment account through which investments are made 198
solely in obligations of the United States or its agencies or 199
instrumentalities or guaranteed as to principal and interest by 200
the United States or its agencies or instrumentalities, debt 201
securities rated as investment grade by at least two nationally 202
recognized rating services, the Ohio subdivision's fund pursuant 203
to section 135.45 of the Revised Code, debt securities which the 204
director of commerce has determined to have been issued for the 205
safety and welfare of the residents of this state, and equity 206
interests in mutual funds that invest solely in some or all of 207
the above-listed securities and involve no general liability, 208
without regard to whether income earned on such accounts, 209
securities, or interests is paid periodically or at the end of a 210
term. 211
(K) "Director of commerce" may be read as the "division of 212
unclaimed funds" or the "superintendent of unclaimed funds." 213
(L) "Attorney unclaimed funds" means any unclaimed funds, 214
as defined in division (B)(1) of this section, that are any of 215
the following: 216
(1) Funds held in interest on lawyer trust accounts 217
pursuant to section 4705.09 of the Revised Code; 218

H. B. No. 480 Page 9
As Introduced
(2) Funds held in an interest on trust accounts pursuant 219
to section 3953.231 of the Revised Code; 220
(3) Residual settlement funds whether for named or unnamed 221
plaintiffs, received by the division of unclaimed funds, and 222
held, paid out, or allocated by the division pursuant to or 223
consistent with the terms and conditions of the court order 224
authorizing the settlement fund. 225
(M) "Virtual currency" means a digital representation of 226
value used as a medium of exchange, unit of account, or store of 227
value that does not have legal tender status recognized by the 228
United States. "Virtual currency" does not include any of the 229
following: 230
(1) The software or protocols governing the transfer of 231
the digital representation of value; 232
(2) Game-related digital content; 233
(3) A gift card; 234
(4) A loyalty card; 235
(5) A rewards card. 236
(N) "Game-related digital content" means digital content 237
that exists only in an electronic game or electronic-game 238
platform. 239
(1) "Game-related digital content" includes all of the 240
following: 241
(a) Game-play currency such as a virtual wallet, even if 242
denominated in United States currency; 243
(b) Both of the following if for use or redemption only 244
within the game or platform or another electronic game or 245

H. B. No. 480 Page 10
As Introduced
electronic-game platform: 246
(i) Points sometimes referred to as gems, tokens, gold, 247
and similar names; 248
(ii) Digital codes. 249
(2) "Game-related digital content" does not include either 250
of the following: 251
(a) An item that the issuer permits to be redeemed for use 252
outside a game or platform for money or for goods or services 253
that have more than minimal value; 254
(b) An item that the issuer otherwise monetizes for use 255
outside a game or platform. 256
(O) "Gift card" means a stored value card, including a 257
prepaid commercial mobile radio service as defined in 47 C.F.R. 258
20.3, that meets all of the following conditions: 259
(1) The value of the card does not expire. 260
(2) The card may be decreased in value only by redemption 261
for merchandise, goods, or services. 262
(3) Unless required by law, the card may not be redeemed 263
for or converted into money or otherwise monetized by the 264
issuer. 265
(P) "Loyalty card" means a record given without direct 266
monetary consideration under an award, reward, benefit, loyalty, 267
incentive, rebate, or promotional program that may be used or 268
redeemed only to obtain goods or services. "Loyalty card" does 269
not include a reward card or a record that may be redeemed for 270
money or otherwise monetized by the issuer. 271
Sec. 169.02. Subject to division (B) of section 169.01 of 272

H. B. No. 480 Page 11
As Introduced
the Revised Code, the following constitute unclaimed funds: 273
(A) Except as provided in division (R) of this section, 274
any demand, savings, or matured time deposit account, or matured 275
certificate of deposit, together with any interest or dividend 276
on it, less any lawful claims, that is held or owed by a holder 277
which is a financial organization, unclaimed for a period of 278
five years; 279
(B) Any funds paid toward the purchase of withdrawable 280
shares or other interest in a financial organization, and any 281
interest or dividends on them, less any lawful claims, that is 282
held or owed by a holder which is a financial organization, 283
unclaimed for a period of five years; 284
(C) Except as provided in division (A) of section 3903.45 285
of the Revised Code, moneys held or owed by a holder, including 286
a fraternal association, providing life insurance, including 287
annuity or endowment coverage, unclaimed for three years after 288
becoming payable as established from the records of such holder 289
under any life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract 290
that has matured or terminated. An insurance policy, the 291
proceeds of which are payable on the death of the insured, not 292
matured by proof of death of the insured is deemed matured and 293
the proceeds payable if such policy was in force when the 294
insured attained the limiting age under the mortality table on 295
which the reserve is based. 296
Moneys otherwise payable according to the records of such 297
holder are deemed payable although the policy or contract has 298
not been surrendered as required. 299
(D) Any deposit made to secure payment or any sum paid in 300
advance for utility services of a public utility and any amount 301

H. B. No. 480 Page 12
As Introduced
refundable from rates or charges collected by a public utility 302
for utility services held or owed by a holder, less any lawful 303
claims, that has remained unclaimed for one year after the 304
termination of the services for which the deposit or advance 305
payment was made or one year from the date the refund was 306
payable, whichever is earlier; 307
(E) Except as provided in division (R) of this section, 308
any certificates, securities as defined in section 1707.01 of 309
the Revised Code, nonwithdrawable shares, other instruments 310
evidencing ownership, or rights to them or funds paid toward the 311
purchase of them, or any dividend, capital credit, profit, 312
distribution, interest, or payment on principal or other sum, 313
held or owed by a holder, including funds deposited with a 314
fiscal agent or fiduciary for payment of them, and instruments 315
representing an ownership interest, unclaimed for five years. 316
Any underlying share or other intangible instrument representing 317
an ownership interest in a business association, in which the 318
issuer has recorded on its books the issuance of the share but 319
has been unable to deliver the certificate to the shareholder, 320
constitutes unclaimed funds if such underlying share is 321
unclaimed for five years. In addition, an underlying share 322
constitutes unclaimed funds if a dividend, distribution, or 323
other sum payable as a result of the underlying share has 324
remained unclaimed by the owner for five years. 325
This division shall not prejudice the rights of fiscal 326
agents or fiduciaries for payment to return the items described 327
in this division to their principals, according to the terms of 328
an agency or fiduciary agreement, but such a return shall 329
constitute the principal as the holder of the items and shall 330
not interrupt the period for computing the time for which the 331
items have remained unclaimed. 332

H. B. No. 480 Page 13
As Introduced
In the case of any such funds accruing and held or owed by 333
a corporation under division (E) of section 1701.24 of the 334
Revised Code, such corporation shall comply with this chapter, 335
subject to the limitation contained in section 1701.34 of the 336
Revised Code. The period of time for which such funds have gone 337
unclaimed specified in section 1701.34 of the Revised Code shall 338
be computed, with respect to dividends or distributions, 339
commencing as of the dates when such dividends or distributions 340
would have been payable to the shareholder had such shareholder 341
surrendered the certificates for cancellation and exchange by 342
the date specified in the order relating to them. 343
Capital credits of a cooperative which after January 1, 344
1972, have been allocated to members and which by agreement are 345
expressly required to be paid if claimed after death of the 346
owner are deemed payable, for the purpose of this chapter, 347
fifteen years after either the termination of service by the 348
cooperative to the owner or upon the nonactivity as provided in 349
division (B) of section 169.01 of the Revised Code, whichever 350
occurs later, provided that this provision does not apply if the 351
payment is not mandatory. 352
(F) Any sum payable on certified checks or other written 353
instruments certified or issued and representing funds held or 354
owed by a holder, less any lawful claims, that are unclaimed for 355
five years from the date payable or from the date of issuance if 356
payable on demand; except that the unclaimed period for money 357
orders that are not third party bank checks is seven years, and 358
the unclaimed period for traveler's checks is fifteen years, 359
from the date payable or from the date of issuance if payable on 360
demand. 361
As used in this division, "written instruments" include, 362

H. B. No. 480 Page 14
As Introduced
but are not limited to, certified checks, cashier's checks, 363
bills of exchange, letters of credit, drafts, money orders, and 364
traveler's checks. 365
If there is no address of record for the owner or other 366
person entitled to the funds, such address is presumed to be the 367
address where the instrument was certified or issued. 368
(G) Except as provided in division (R) of this section, 369
all moneys, rights to moneys, or other intangible property, 370
arising out of the business of engaging in the purchase or sale 371
of securities, or otherwise dealing in intangibles, less any 372
lawful claims, that are held or owed by a holder and are 373
unclaimed for five years from the date of transaction. 374
(H) Except as provided in division (A) of section 3903.45 375
of the Revised Code, all moneys, rights to moneys, and other 376
intangible property distributable in the course of dissolution 377
or liquidation of a holder that are unclaimed for one year after 378
the date set by the holder for distribution; 379
(I) All moneys, rights to moneys, or other intangible 380
property removed from a safe-deposit box or other safekeeping 381
repository located in this state or removed from a safe-deposit 382
box or other safekeeping repository of a holder, on which the 383
lease or rental period has expired, or any amount arising from 384
the sale of such property, less any lawful claims, that are 385
unclaimed for three years from the date on which the lease or 386
rental period expired; 387
(J) Subject to division (M)(2) of this section, all 388
moneys, rights to moneys, or other intangible property, and any 389
income or increment on them, held or owed by a holder which is a 390
fiduciary for the benefit of another, or a fiduciary or 391

H. B. No. 480 Page 15
As Introduced
custodian of a qualified retirement plan or individual 392
retirement arrangement under section 401 or 408 of the Internal 393
Revenue Code, unclaimed for three years after the final date for 394
distribution; 395
(K) All moneys, rights to moneys, or other intangible 396
property held or owed in this state or held for or owed to an 397
owner whose last known address is within this state, by the 398
United States government or any state, as those terms are 399
described in division (E) of section 169.01 of the Revised Code, 400
unclaimed by the owner for three years, excluding any property 401
in the control of any court in a proceeding in which a final 402
adjudication has not been made; 403
(L) Amounts payable pursuant to the terms of any policy of 404
insurance, other than life insurance, or any refund available 405
under such a policy, held or owed by any holder, unclaimed for 406
three years from the date payable or distributable; 407
(M)(1) Subject to division (M)(2) of this section, any 408
funds constituting rents or lease payments due, any deposit made 409
to secure payment of rents or leases, or any sum paid in advance 410
for rents, leases, possible damage to property, unused services, 411
performance requirements, or any other purpose, held or owed by 412
a holder unclaimed for one year; 413
(2) Any escrow funds, security deposits, or other moneys 414
that are received by a licensed broker in a fiduciary capacity 415
and that, pursuant to division (A)(26) of section 4735.18 of the 416
Revised Code, are required to be deposited into and maintained 417
in a special or trust, noninterest-bearing bank account separate 418
and distinct from any personal or other account of the licensed 419
broker, held or owed by the licensed broker unclaimed for two 420
years. 421

H. B. No. 480 Page 16
As Introduced
(N) Any sum greater than fifty dollars payable as wages, 422
any sum Sums payable as salaries or commissions, any sum sums 423
payable for services rendered, funds owed or held as royalties, 424
oil and mineral proceeds, funds held for or owed to suppliers, 425
and moneys owed under pension and profit-sharing plans, held or 426
owed by any holder unclaimed for one year from date payable or 427
distributable, and all other credits held or owed, or to be 428
refunded to a retail customer, by any holder unclaimed for three 429
years from date payable or distributable; 430
(O) Amounts held in respect of or represented by lay-aways 431
sold after January 1, 1972, less any lawful claims, when such 432
lay-aways are unclaimed for three years after the sale of them; 433
(P) All moneys, rights to moneys, and other intangible 434
property not otherwise constituted as unclaimed funds by this 435
section, including any income or increment on them, less any 436
lawful claims, which are held or owed by any holder, other than 437
a holder which holds a permit issued pursuant to Chapter 3769. 438
of the Revised Code, and which have remained unclaimed for three 439
years after becoming payable or distributable; 440
(Q) All moneys that arise out of a sale held pursuant to 441
section 5322.03 of the Revised Code, that are held by a holder 442
for delivery on demand to the appropriate person pursuant to 443
division (I) of that section, and that are unclaimed for two 444
years after the date of the sale. 445
(R)(1)(R)(1)(a) Any funds that are subject to an agreement 446
between the holder and owner providing for automatic 447
reinvestment and that constitute dividends, distributions, or 448
other sums held or owed by a holder in connection with a 449
security as defined in section 1707.01 of the Revised Code, or 450
an ownership interest in an investment company registered under 451

H. B. No. 480 Page 17
As Introduced
the "Investment Company Act of 1940," 54 Stat. 789, 15 U.S.C. 452
80a-1, as amended, or a certificate of deposit, unclaimed for a 453
period of five years. 454
(2)(b) The five-year period under division (R)(1)(R)(1)(a) 455
of this section commences from the date a second shareholder 456
notification or electronic or digital communication mailing to 457
the owner of the funds is returned to the holder as 458
undeliverable by the United States postal service or other 459
carrier. The notification or electronic or digital communication 460
mailing by the holder shall be no less frequent than quarterly. 461
All moneys in a personal allowance account, as defined by 462
rules adopted by the medicaid director, up to and including the 463
maximum resource limitation, of a medicaid recipient who has 464
died after receiving care in a long-term care facility, and for 465
whom there is no identifiable heir or sponsor, are not subject 466
to this chapter. 467
(2)(a) Subject to division (R)(2)(b) of this section, any 468
funds that are subject to an agreement between the holder and 469
owner providing for automatic reinvestment or renewal and that 470
constitute dividends, distributions, or other sums held or owed 471
by a holder in connection with a certificate of deposit, 472
unclaimed for a period of five years. 473
(b) Regarding the first time the certificate of deposit is 474
due for renewal, the five-year dormancy period described in 475
division (R)(2)(a) of this section does not begin to run if the 476
owner consented to the continued automatic reinvestment or 477
renewal, in a record on file with the holder, at or about the 478
time the underlying certificate of deposit is due for renewal. 479
In order to similarly toll the five-year dormancy period 480
following subsequent renewals, a new consent shall be given not 481

H. B. No. 480 Page 18
As Introduced
less frequently than every five years, regardless of the term of 482
the certificate of deposit. If consent is not timely given, the 483
five-year dormancy period begins to run five years after the 484
most recent consent is due. If a new consent is given, the five- 485
year period after which a new consent is required begins from 486
the date that new consent is given. 487
(S)(1) Funds held or owed by a holder pursuant to a 488
preneed funeral contract, as defined in section 4717.01 of the 489
Revised Code, unclaimed as of the last day of the calendar year 490
in which the beneficiary turns one hundred five years of age, 491
unless the holder or the seller or successor seller confirms 492
during that calendar year that the beneficiary is still alive; 493
(2) Funds held or owed by a holder that is the trustee of 494
a preneed funeral contract trust if the trustee was unable to 495
pay the net funds held by the trustee as required by division 496
(J)(2) of section 4717.36 of the Revised Code upon the 497
expiration of the one-hundred-eighty-day period specified in 498
that division. 499
(3) Funds held or owed by a holder which is a trustee of a 500
preneed funeral contract trust that the trustee was unable to 501
pay as required by division (J)(2) of section 4717.36 of the 502
Revised Code upon the expiration of the one hundred eighty-day- 503
period specified in that division. 504
(T) Virtual currency, held by a holder and unclaimed for a 505
period of five years. 506
Sec. 169.03. (A)(1) Every holder of unclaimed funds and, 507
when requested, every person that could be the holder of 508
unclaimed funds, under this chapter shall report to the director 509
of commerce with respect to the unclaimed funds as provided in 510

H. B. No. 480 Page 19
As Introduced
this section. The report shall be verified. 511
(2) With respect to items of unclaimed funds each having a 512
value of fifty dollars or more, the report required under 513
division (A)(1) of this section shall include the following: 514
(a) The full name, if known, and last known address, if 515
any, of each person appearing from the records of the holder to 516
be the owner of unclaimed funds under this chapter; 517
(b) In the case of unclaimed funds reported by holders 518
providing life insurance coverage, the full name of the insured 519
or annuitant and beneficiary, if any, and their last known 520
addresses according to the holder's records; 521
(c) The nature and identifying number, if any, or 522
description of the funds and the amount appearing from the 523
records to be due; 524
(d) The date when the funds became payable, demandable, or 525
returnable and the date of the last transaction with the owner 526
with respect to the funds; 527
(e) Subject to division (J) of this section, the social 528
security number of the owner of the unclaimed funds, if it is 529
available; 530
(f) If the item of unclaimed funds has a value of one 531
thousand dollars or more and the holder has verified that the 532
last known address as shown by the records of the holder is not 533
accurate as provided in division (E) of this section, a 534
statement that efforts were undertaken by the holder to verify 535
that the address is not accurate. Any verifying documentation 536
shall be maintained by the holder for five years from the date 537
of the report and shall be available upon request to the 538
director or the director's designee. 539

H. B. No. 480 Page 20
As Introduced
(g) Other information that the director prescribes as 540
necessary for the administration of this chapter. 541
(3) With respect to items of unclaimed funds each having a 542
value of less than fifty dollars, the report required under 543
division (A)(1) of this section shall include the following: 544
(a) Each category of items of unclaimed funds as described 545
in section 169.02 of the Revised Code; 546
(b) The number of items of unclaimed funds within each 547
category; 548
(c) The aggregated value of the items of unclaimed funds 549
within each category. 550
(4) With respect to items of unclaimed funds that are 551
virtual currency, the holder shall liquidate the virtual 552
currency prior to filing the report required under division (A) 553
(1) of this section. The owner shall have no recourse against 554
either the holder or the director for any gain in value after 555
liquidation. 556
(B) If the holder of unclaimed funds is holding attorney 557
unclaimed funds or residual settlement funds, the holder shall 558
transmit, upon the division's request, a duplicate copy of the 559
report required by division (A) of this section to the Ohio 560
access to justice foundation, established pursuant to section 561
120.521 of the Revised Code. 562
(C) If the holder of unclaimed funds is a successor to 563
other organizations that previously held the funds for the 564
owner, or if the holder has changed its name while holding the 565
funds, it shall file with the report all prior known names and 566
addresses and date and state of incorporation or formation of 567
each holder of the funds. 568

H. B. No. 480 Page 21
As Introduced
(D) The report shall be filed before the first day of 569
November of each year as of the preceding thirtieth day of June, 570
but the report of holders providing life insurance coverage 571
shall be filed before the first day of May of each year as of 572
the preceding thirty-first day of December. The director may 573
postpone, for good cause shown, the reporting date upon written 574
request by any holder required to file a report. 575
(E) The holder of unclaimed funds under this chapter shall 576
send notice to each owner of each item of unclaimed funds having 577
a value of fifty dollars or more at the last known address of 578
the owner as shown by the records of the holder before filing 579
the annual report. In case of holders providing life insurance 580
coverage, this notice shall also be mailed to each beneficiary 581
at the last known address of the beneficiary as shown by the 582
records of the holder, except that the notice to beneficiaries 583
shall not be mailed if that address is the same as that of the 584
insured and the surname of the beneficiary is the same as that 585
of the insured. The holder shall not report an item of unclaimed 586
funds earlier than the thirtieth day after the mailing of notice 587
required by this division. 588
The notice required by this division shall set forth the 589
nature and identifying number, if any, or description of the 590
funds and the amount appearing on the records of the holder to 591
be due the owner or beneficiary, and shall inform the owner or 592
beneficiary that the funds will, thirty days after the mailing 593
of the notice, be reported as unclaimed funds under this 594
chapter. A self-addressed, stamped envelope shall be included 595
with the notice, with instructions that the owner or beneficiary 596
may use the envelope to inform the holder of the owner's or 597
beneficiary's continued interest in the funds, and, if so 598
informed before the date for making the report to the director, 599

H. B. No. 480 Page 22
As Introduced
the holder shall not report the funds to the director. The 600
notice shall be mailed by first class mail, or to a digital or 601
electronic address provided to the holder by the owner with 602
"read receipt" requested, if the item of unclaimed funds has a 603
value of fifty dollars or more but less than one thousand 604
dollars and. The notice shall be sent by certified mail, return 605
receipt requested, if the item of unclaimed funds has a value of 606
one thousand dollars or more, unless the holder has verified 607
that the last known address of the owner or beneficiary as shown 608
by the records of the holder is not accurate. For purposes of 609
this section, a holder has verified that the last known address 610
of the owner or beneficiary is not accurate by documenting at 611
least two of the following: 612
(1) The owner or beneficiary failed to respond to a first 613
class mail notice sent to the last known address of the owner or 614
beneficiary. 615
(2) A first class mail notice sent by the holder to the 616
last known address of the owner or beneficiary was returned as 617
undeliverable. 618
(3) An electronic or manual search of available public 619
records failed to confirm that the last known address of the 620
owner or beneficiary is accurate. The holder shall maintain 621
documentation of its search efforts. If a search of public 622
records or databases identifies a more recent address for the 623
owner or beneficiary than the address in the holder's records, 624
the holder shall send notice to the owner or beneficiary at that 625
more recent address in accordance with this section. 626
(4) Electronic or digital notice sent by the holder to the 627
last known electronic mail, text telephone number, or facsimile 628
number verified as received by a "read receipt" or otherwise. 629

H. B. No. 480 Page 23
As Introduced
A holder that sends a notice by certified mail, return 630
receipt requested, may charge the item of unclaimed funds up to 631
twenty dollars for providing that notice. 632
If there is no address of record for the owner or 633
beneficiary, the holder is relieved of any responsibility of 634
sending notice, attempting to notify, or notifying the owner or 635
beneficiary. The mailing of notice pursuant to this section 636
shall discharge the holder from any further responsibility to 637
give notice. 638
(F) Verification of the report and of the mailing of 639
notice, where required, shall be executed by an officer of the 640
reporting holder. 641
(G)(1) The director may, at reasonable times and upon 642
reasonable notice, examine or cause to be examined, by auditors 643
of supervisory departments or divisions of the state, the 644
records of any holder to determine compliance with this chapter. 645
(2) Holders shall retain records, designated by the 646
director as applicable to unclaimed funds, for five ten years 647
beyond the relevant time period provided in section 169.02 of 648
the Revised Code, or until completion of an audit conducted 649
pursuant to division (G) of this section, whichever occurs 650
firstfiling of the report required under division (A)(1) of this 651
section. An audit conducted pursuant to division (G) of this 652
section shall not require a holder to make records available for 653
a period of time exceeding the records retention period set 654
forth in division (G) (G)(2) of this section, except for records 655
pertaining to instruments evidencing ownership, or rights to 656
them or funds paid toward the purchase of them, or any dividend, 657
capital credit, profit, distribution, interest, or payment on 658
principal or other sum, held or owed by a holder, including 659

H. B. No. 480 Page 24
As Introduced
funds deposited with a fiscal agent or fiduciary for payment of 660
them, or pertaining to debt of a publicly traded corporation. 661
Any holder that is audited pursuant to division (G) of this 662
section shall only be required to make available those records 663
that are relevant to an unclaimed funds audit of that holder as 664
prescribed by the director. 665
(3) The director may enter into contracts, pursuant to 666
procedures prescribed by the director, with persons for the sole 667
purpose of examining the records of holders, determining 668
compliance with this chapter, and collecting, taking possession 669
of, and remitting to the department's division of unclaimed 670
funds, in a timely manner, the amounts found and defined as 671
unclaimed. The director shall not enter into such a contract 672
with a person unless the person does all of the following: 673
(a) Agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the records 674
examined, as required under division (G)(4) of this section; 675
(b) Agrees to conduct the audit in accordance with rules 676
adopted under section 169.09 of the Revised Code; 677
(c) Obtains a corporate surety bond issued by a bonding 678
company or insurance company authorized to do business in this 679
state. The bond shall be in favor of the director and in the 680
penal sum determined by the director. The bond shall be for the 681
benefit of any holder of unclaimed funds that is audited by the 682
principal and is injured by the principal's failure to comply 683
with division (G)(3)(a) or (b) of this section. 684
(4) Records audited pursuant to division (G) of this 685
section are confidential, and shall not be disclosed except as 686
required by section 169.06 of the Revised Code or as the 687
director considers necessary in the proper administration of 688

H. B. No. 480 Page 25
As Introduced
this chapter. 689
(5) If a person with whom the director has entered into a 690
contract pursuant to division (G)(3) of this section intends to 691
conduct, in conjunction with an unclaimed funds audit under this 692
section, an unclaimed funds audit for the purpose of 693
administering another state's unclaimed or abandoned property 694
laws, the person, prior to commencing the audit, shall provide 695
written notice to the director of the person's intent to conduct 696
such an audit, along with documentation evidencing the person's 697
express authorization from the other state to conduct the audit 698
on behalf of that state. 699
(6) Prior to the commencement of an audit conducted 700
pursuant to division (G) of this section, the director shall 701
notify the holder of unclaimed funds of the director's intent to 702
audit the holder's records. If the audit will be conducted in 703
conjunction with an audit for one or more other states, the 704
director shall provide the holder with the name or names of 705
those states. 706
(7) Any holder of unclaimed funds may appeal the findings 707
of an audit conducted pursuant to division (G) of this section 708
to the director. Pursuant to the authority granted by section 709
169.09 of the Revised Code, the director shall adopt rules 710
establishing procedures for considering such an appeal. 711
(H) All holders shall make sufficient investigation of 712
their records to ensure that the funds reported to the director 713
are unclaimed as set forth in division (B) of section 169.01 and 714
section 169.02 of the Revised Code. 715
(I) The (I)(1) Subject to division (I)(2) of this section, 716
the expiration of any period of limitations on or after March 1, 717

H. B. No. 480 Page 26
As Introduced
1968, within which a person entitled to any moneys, rights to 718
moneys, or intangible property could have commenced an action or 719
proceeding to obtain these items shall not prevent these items 720
from becoming unclaimed funds or relieve the holder of them of 721
any duty to report and give notice as provided in this section 722
and deliver them in the manner provided in section 169.05 of the 723
Revised Code, provided that the holder may comply with this 724
section and section 169.05 of the Revised Code with respect to 725
any moneys, rights to moneys, or intangible property as to which 726
the applicable statute of limitations has run prior to March 1, 727
1968, and in that event the holder shall be entitled to the 728
protective provisions of section 169.07 of the Revised Code. 729
(2) The director of commerce shall not commence an action 730
or proceeding to enforce this chapter in regards to the 731
reporting, delivery, or payment of unclaimed funds more than ten 732
years after the holder filed a report with the director. The 733
period of limitation is tolled in the absence of such a report 734
or by the filing of a report that is fraudulent. 735
(J) No social security number contained in a report made 736
pursuant to this section shall be used by the department of 737
commerce for any purpose other than to enable the division of 738
unclaimed funds to carry out the purposes of this chapter and 739
for child support purposes in response to a request made by the 740
office of child support in the department of job and family 741
services made pursuant to section 3123.88 of the Revised Code. 742
(K) Notwithstanding any provision in the law to the 743
contrary, nothing shall prevent a holder from voluntarily making 744
any property subject to the reporting requirements of this 745
section, if that property has a value of less than twenty-five 746
dollars but would otherwise meet the definition of unclaimed 747

H. B. No. 480 Page 27
As Introduced
funds under section 169.01 of the Revised Code. 748
Sec. 169.05. (A) Every Except as otherwise provided in 749
this division, every holder required to file a report under 750
section 169.03 of the Revised Code, including holders who 751
voluntarily report under division (K) of that section, shall, at 752
the time of filing, pay to the director of commerce ten per cent 753
of the aggregate amount of unclaimed funds as shown on the 754
report, except for aggregate amounts of fifty dollars or less in 755
which case one hundred per cent shall be paid. In the case of 756
unclaimed funds that are certificates of deposit described in 757
division (R)(2) of section 169.02 of the Revised Code, if the 758
time provided for payment to the director above would result in 759
a penalty or forfeiture in the payment of interest, the time for 760
payment to the director shall be extended until the time when no 761
penalty or forfeiture would result. The funds may be deposited 762
by the director in the state treasury to the credit of the 763
unclaimed funds trust fund, which is hereby created, or placed 764
with a financial organization. The director shall consult with 765
the treasurer of state each April to formulate an investment 766
strategy and plan that consists of the best method to invest the 767
funds to achieve the goals of the department of commerce and to 768
achieve an appropriate rate of return. The holders of all 769
investments and entities with which trust fund moneys are 770
deposited shall annually notify the director of commerce of the 771
amount of interest earned or other income realized on the 772
unclaimed funds held or invested with the entity pursuant to 773
this section. 774
Upon the request of the director of commerce, the 775
treasurer of state shall invest the funds within the unclaimed 776
funds trust fund in income-bearing accounts in custodial 777
accounts with the treasurer of state, outside the state 778

H. B. No. 480 Page 28
As Introduced
treasury. The limitation on investments in debt interests 779
provided in division (A)(11)(a) of section 135.143 of the 780
Revised Code does not apply to these custodial accounts. Any 781
interest earned on money in the unclaimed funds trust fund or in 782
any custodial accounts created under this division shall be 783
credited to the trust fund. The remainder of the aggregate 784
amount of unclaimed funds as shown on the report, plus earnings 785
accrued to date of payment to the director, shall, at the option 786
of the director, be retained by the holder or paid to the 787
director for deposit as agent for the mortgage funds with a 788
financial organization as defined in section 169.01 of the 789
Revised Code, with the funds to be in income-bearing accounts to 790
the credit of the mortgage funds, or the holder may enter into 791
an agreement with the director specifying the obligations of the 792
United States in which funds are to be invested, and agree to 793
pay the interest on the obligations to the state. Holders 794
retaining any funds not in obligations of the United States 795
shall enter into an agreement with the director specifying the 796
classification of income-bearing account in which the funds will 797
be held and pay the state interest on the funds at a rate equal 798
to the prevailing market rate for similar funds. Moneys that the 799
holder is required to pay to the director rather than to retain 800
may be deposited with the treasurer of state, or placed with a 801
financial organization. 802
Securities and other intangible property transferred to 803
the director shall, within a reasonable time, be converted to 804
cash at the discretion of the director and the proceeds 805
deposited as provided for other funds. 806
The funds evidenced by agreements, in income-bearing 807
accounts, or on deposit with the treasurer of state shall be 808
allocated on the records of the director, after allocation of 809

H. B. No. 480 Page 29
As Introduced
sufficient moneys to the minority business bonding fund to meet 810
the provisions of division (B) of this section, to the housing 811
development fund created by division (A) of section 175.11 of 812
the Revised Code. 813
(B) The director shall serve as agent for the director of 814
development and as agent for the Ohio housing finance agency in 815
making deposits and withdrawals and maintaining records 816
pertaining to the minority business bonding fund created by 817
section 122.88 of the Revised Code and the housing development 818
fund created by section 175.11 of the Revised Code. Funds from 819
the housing development fund are available upon request to the 820
Ohio housing finance agency, in an amount not to exceed the 821
funds allocated on the records of the director, for the purposes 822
of section 175.05 of the Revised Code. Funds from the minority 823
business bonding fund are available to the director of 824
development upon request to pay obligations on bonds the 825
director writes pursuant to section 122.88 of the Revised Code; 826
except that, unless the general assembly authorizes additional 827
amounts, the total maximum amount of moneys that may be 828
allocated to the minority business bonding fund under this 829
division section is ten million dollars. 830
When funds are to be disbursed, the appropriate agency 831
shall call upon the director to transfer the necessary funds to 832
it. The director shall first withdraw the funds paid by the 833
holders and deposited with the treasurer of state or in a 834
financial institution as agent for the funds. Whenever these 835
funds are inadequate to meet the request, the director shall 836
provide for a withdrawal of funds, within a reasonable time and 837
in the amount necessary to meet the request, from financial 838
institutions in which the funds were retained or placed by a 839
holder and from other holders who have retained funds, in an 840

H. B. No. 480 Page 30
As Introduced
equitable manner as the director prescribes. In the event that 841
the amount to be withdrawn from any one holder is less than five 842
hundred dollars, the amount to be withdrawn is at the director's 843
discretion. The director shall then transfer to the agency the 844
amount of funds requested. 845
Funds deposited in the unclaimed funds trust fund are 846
subject to call by the director when necessary to pay claims the 847
director allows under section 169.08 of the Revised Code, in 848
accordance with the director's rules, to defray the necessary 849
costs of making publications this chapter requires and to pay 850
other operating and administrative expenses the department of 851
commerce incurs in the administration and enforcement of this 852
chapter. 853
The unclaimed funds trust fund shall be assessed a 854
proportionate share of the administrative costs of the 855
department of commerce in accordance with procedures the 856
director of commerce prescribes. The assessment shall be paid 857
from the unclaimed funds trust fund to the division of 858
administration fund. 859
(C) Earnings on the accounts in financial organizations to 860
the credit of the mortgage funds shall, at the option of the 861
financial organization, be credited to the accounts at times and 862
at rates as earnings are paid on other accounts of the same 863
classification held in the financial organization or paid to the 864
director. The director shall be notified annually, and at other 865
times as the director may request, of the amount of the earnings 866
credited to the accounts. Interest on unclaimed funds a holder 867
retains shall be paid to the director or credited as specified 868
in the agreement under which the organization retains the funds. 869
Interest payable to the director under an agreement to invest 870

H. B. No. 480 Page 31
As Introduced
unclaimed funds in income-bearing accounts or obligations of the 871
United States shall be paid annually by the holder to the 872
director. Any earnings or interest the director receives under 873
this division shall be deposited in and credited to the mortgage 874
funds. 875
Sec. 169.06. (A) Before the first day of November of each 876
year immediately following the calendar year in which the filing 877
of reports is required by section 169.03 of the Revised Code, 878
the director of commerce shall cause notice to be published once 879
in an English language newspaper of general circulation in the 880
county in this state in which is located the last known address 881
of any person to be named in the notice required by this 882
section. The notice may be published in print or electronic 883
format. If no address is listed, the notice shall be published 884
in the county in which the holder of the unclaimed funds has its 885
principal place of business within this state; or if the holder 886
has no principal place of business within this state, 887
publication shall be made as the director determines most 888
effective. If the address is outside this state, notice shall be 889
published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or 890
parish of any state in the United States in which such last 891
known address is located. If the last known address is in a 892
foreign country, publication shall be made as the director 893
determines most effective. 894
If the name of the owner is not available, the director 895
may publish notice by class, identifying number, or as the 896
director determines most effective. 897
(B) The published notice shall be entitled "Notice of 898
Names of Persons Appearing to be Owners of Unclaimed Funds," and 899
shall contain: 900

H. B. No. 480 Page 32
As Introduced
(1) The names in alphabetical order and last known 901
addresses, if any, of each person appearing from the records of 902
the holder to be the owner of unclaimed funds of a value of 903
fifty dollars or more and entitled to notice as specified in 904
division (A) of this section; 905
(2) A statement that information concerning the amount of 906
the funds and any necessary information concerning the 907
presentment of a claim therefor may be obtained by any persons 908
possessing a property interest in the unclaimed funds by 909
addressing an inquiry to the director. 910
(C) With respect to items of unclaimed funds each having a 911
value of ten dollars or more, the director shall have available 912
in the director's office during business hours an alphabetical 913
list of owners and where a holder is a person providing life 914
insurance coverage, beneficiaries, and their last known 915
addresses, if any, whose funds are being held by the state 916
pursuant to this chapter. 917
(D) The director may give any additional notice using any 918
electronic or print medium that the director deems necessary to 919
inform the owner of the whereabouts of the owner's funds. 920
Sec. 169.07. (A) Upon the payment or delivery of unclaimed 921
funds to the director of commerce under section 169.05 of the 922
Revised Code in good faith and in compliance with this chapter, 923
the holder will be relieved of further responsibility for the 924
safe-keeping thereof and will be held harmless by the state from 925
any and all liabilities for any claim arising out of the 926
transfer of such funds to the state, to the extent of the value 927
of the unclaimed funds paid, as of the time of the payment. 928
(B) If legal proceedings are instituted against a holder 929

H. B. No. 480 Page 33
As Introduced
which has paid unclaimed funds to the director or entered into 930
an agreement as provided in section 169.05 of the Revised Code 931
in respect to such funds, such holder shall notify the director 932
in writing of the pendency of such proceedings not later than 933
fourteen days after the date process is served on the holder. 934
Failure by a holder to give such notice absolves the state from 935
any liability the state may otherwise have with regard to the 936
unclaimed funds, beyond the value of the unclaimed funds paid by 937
the holder to the director. 938
(C)(1) Upon receiving notice of a legal proceeding, in 939
accordance with division (B) of this section, the director may 940
take such action as the director considers necessary or 941
expedient to protect the interests of the state. If the director 942
elects to intervene and assume the defense of such proceedings 943
and judgment is entered against such holder, the director shall, 944
upon proof of satisfaction of such judgment, forthwith reimburse 945
such organization for the amount of the judgment or enter into 946
an agreement modified to reflect the satisfaction of such 947
judgment, if the holder retained such funds, and shall reimburse 948
such holder for any legal fees, costs and other expenses 949
incurred in such proceedings in the manner provided for the 950
payment of claims under divisions (D) and (E) of section 169.08 951
of the Revised Code. 952
(2) If the director elects not to intervene and assume the 953
defense of such proceedings, and judgment is entered against 954
such holder for any amount paid to the director pursuant to this 955
chapter, the director shall, upon proof of satisfaction of such 956
judgment, forthwith reimburse such organization for the amount 957
so paid or enter into an agreement modified to reflect the 958
satisfaction of such judgment, if the holder retained such 959
funds, to the extent of the value of the unclaimed funds paid by 960

H. B. No. 480 Page 34
As Introduced
the holder to the director. 961
(D) No person has a claim against the state, a holder of 962
unclaimed funds, or a transfer agent, registrar, or other person 963
acting for, or on behalf of, a holder for any change in the 964
market value of unclaimed funds occurring after payment by the 965
holder to the director of commerce, or after sale of the 966
unclaimed funds by the director. 967
(E) The director of commerce is not required to hold 968
harmless, or to intervene and assume the defense of, a holder of 969
unclaimed funds that does not act in good faith, or that does 970
not act in compliance with this chapter and the rules adopted in 971
accordance with this chapter, when reporting unclaimed funds. 972
This section does not insure or indemnify a holder of unclaimed 973
funds against the holder's own acts or omissions, negligence, 974
bad faith, or breach of any duties owed to the owner of the 975
unclaimed funds or the director of commerce. 976
Sec. 169.08. (A) Except as otherwise provided in division 977
(I) of this section, the director of commerce shall pay to the 978
owner or other person who has established the right to payment 979
under this section, funds from the unclaimed funds trust fund in 980
an amount equal to the amount of property delivered or reported 981
to the director, or equal to the net proceeds if the securities 982
or other property have been sold, together with interest earned 983
by the state if required to be paid under division (D) of this 984
section. Any person claiming a property interest in unclaimed 985
funds delivered or reported to the state under Chapter 169. of 986
the Revised Code, including the office of child support in the 987
department of job and family services, pursuant to section 988
3123.88 of the Revised Code, may file a claim thereto on the 989
form prescribed by the director. An individual appointed as the 990

H. B. No. 480 Page 35
As Introduced
administrator for the estate of a deceased unclaimed property 991
owner shall be an heir or legatee of an owner of unclaimed funds 992
or have been retained by an heir, legatee, or creditor of an 993
owner of unclaimed funds to recover the unclaimed funds pursuant 994
to sections 169.13 and 169.16 of the Revised Code in order to 995
establish the right to payment under this section. 996
(B) The director shall consider matters relevant to any 997
claim filed under division (A) of this section and shall hold a 998
formal hearing if requested or considered necessary and receive 999
evidence concerning such claim. A finding and decision in 1000
writing on each claim filed shall be prepared, stating the 1001
substance of any evidence received or heard and the reasons for 1002
allowance or disallowance of the claim. The evidence and 1003
decision shall be a public record. Except as otherwise provided 1004
in division (I) of this section, no statute of limitations shall 1005
bar the allowance of a claim. 1006
(C) For the purpose of conducting any hearing, the 1007
director may require the attendance of such witnesses and the 1008
production of such books, records, and papers as the director 1009
desires, and the director may take the depositions of witnesses 1010
residing within or without this state in the same manner as is 1011
prescribed by law for the taking of depositions in civil actions 1012
in the court of common pleas, and for that purpose the director 1013
may issue a subpoena for any witness or a subpoena duces tecum 1014
to compel the production of any books, records, or papers, 1015
directed to the sheriff of the county where such witness resides 1016
or is found, which shall be served and returned. The fees of the 1017
sheriff shall be the same as that allowed in the court of common 1018
pleas in criminal cases. Witnesses shall be paid the fees and 1019
mileage provided for under section 119.094 of the Revised Code. 1020
Fees and mileage shall be paid from the unclaimed funds trust 1021

H. B. No. 480 Page 36
As Introduced
fund. 1022
(D) Except as otherwise provided in division (I) of this 1023
section, interest earned by the state shall be payable to 1024
claimants of unclaimed funds held by the state in accordance 1025
with final court orders derived from the Sogg v. Zurz, 121 Ohio 1026
St.3d 449 (2009), line of cases and final settlement agreement 1027
determining payment of interest on unclaimed funds. For 1028
properties received by the state on or before July 26, 1991, 1029
interest shall be paid at a rate of six per cent per annum from 1030
the date the state received the property up to and including 1031
July 26, 1991. No interest shall be payable on any properties 1032
for the period from July 27, 1991, up to and including August 2, 1033
2000. For properties held by the state on August 3, 2000, or 1034
after, interest shall be paid at the applicable required rate 1035
per annum for the period held from August 3, 2000, or the date 1036
of receipt, whichever is later, up to and including the date the 1037
claim is paid. 1038
(E) Claims shall be paid from the trust fund. If the 1039
amount available in the trust fund is not sufficient to pay 1040
pending claims, or other amounts disbursable from the trust 1041
fund, the treasurer of state shall certify such fact to the 1042
director, who shall then withdraw such amount of funds from the 1043
mortgage accounts funds as the director determines necessary to 1044
reestablish the trust fund to a level required to pay 1045
anticipated claims but not more than ten per cent of the net 1046
unclaimed funds reported to date. 1047
The director may withdraw the funds paid to the director 1048
by the holders and deposited by the director with the treasurer 1049
of state or in a financial institution as agent for such funds. 1050
Whenever these funds are inadequate to meet the requirements for 1051

H. B. No. 480 Page 37
As Introduced
the trust fund, the director shall provide for a withdrawal of 1052
funds, within a reasonable time, in such amount as is necessary 1053
to meet the requirements, from financial institutions in which 1054
such funds were retained or placed by a holder and from other 1055
holders who have retained funds, in an equitable manner as 1056
prescribed by the director. In the event that the amount to be 1057
withdrawn from any one such holder is less than five hundred 1058
dollars, the amount to be withdrawn shall be at the discretion 1059
of the director. Such funds may be reimbursed in the amounts 1060
withdrawn when the trust fund has a surplus over the amount 1061
required to pay anticipated claims. Whenever the trust fund has 1062
a surplus over the amount required to pay anticipated claims, 1063
the director may transfer such surplus to the mortgage 1064
accountsfunds. 1065
(F)(1) If a claim which is allowed under this section 1066
relates to funds which have been retained by the reporting 1067
holder, and if the funds, on deposit with the treasurer of state 1068
pursuant to this chapter, are insufficient to pay claims, the 1069
director may notify such holder in writing of the payment of the 1070
claim and such holder shall immediately reimburse the state in 1071
the amount of such claim. The reimbursement shall be credited to 1072
the unclaimed funds trust fund. 1073
(2) (F) If a claim that is allowed under this section 1074
relates to attorney unclaimed funds that have been recovered by 1075
the Ohio access to justice foundation, pursuant to division (A) 1076
of section 169.052 of the Revised Code and division (A) of this 1077
section, the director shall notify the Ohio access to justice 1078
foundation in writing of the payment of the claim and the Ohio 1079
access to justice foundation shall immediately reimburse the 1080
unclaimed funds trust fund in the amount of such claim inclusive 1081
of interest as required by division (D) of this section. The 1082

H. B. No. 480 Page 38
As Introduced
reimbursement shall be credited to the unclaimed funds trust 1083
fund. 1084
(G) Any person, including the office of child support, 1085
adversely affected by a decision of the director may appeal such 1086
decision in the manner provided in Chapter 119. of the Revised 1087
Code. 1088
In the event the claimant prevails, the claimant shall be 1089
reimbursed for reasonable attorney's fees and costs. 1090
(H) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 1091
chapter, any holder who has paid moneys to or entered into an 1092
agreement with the director pursuant to section 169.05 of the 1093
Revised Code or entered into an agreement with the director on 1094
certified checks, cashiers' checks, bills of exchange, letters 1095
of credit, drafts, money orders, or travelers' checks, may make 1096
payment to any person entitled thereto, including the office of 1097
child support, and upon surrender of the document, except in the 1098
case of travelers' checks, and proof of such payment, the 1099
director shall reimburse the holder for such payment without 1100
interest. 1101
(I)(1) Unclaimed funds and interest earned thereon that 1102
are first reported to the director under section 169.03 of the 1103
Revised Code on or before January 1, 2016, are deemed abandoned 1104
and escheat to the state on January 1, 2026, if no valid claim 1105
is filed by the owner or another person claiming a right to 1106
payment on or before that date. 1107
(2) Unclaimed funds and interest first reported to the 1108
director after January 1, 2016, are deemed abandoned and escheat 1109
to the state on the tenth anniversary of that reporting date if 1110
no valid claim is filed by the owner or another person claiming 1111

H. B. No. 480 Page 39
As Introduced
a right to payment on or before the tenth anniversary of that 1112
reporting date. 1113
(3)(a) All property rights, legal title to, and ownership 1114
of unclaimed funds and interest vest solely in the state on the 1115
date the unclaimed funds and interest are deemed abandoned and 1116
escheat to the state. 1117
(b) Notwithstanding division (I)(3)(a) of this section, 1118
the former owner or other person claiming a property interest in 1119
unclaimed funds that are deemed abandoned and escheat to the 1120
state may file a claim for payment of an equivalent amount, 1121
together with interest earned by the state if required under 1122
division (D) of this section, at any time on or before January 1123
1, 2036. Upon providing sufficient proof of the validity of the 1124
owner's or other person's claim, the director shall pay the 1125
claim less any expenses and costs incurred by the state in 1126
securing full title and ownership of the unclaimed funds. 1127
(c) If payment is made on a claim under division (I)(3)(b) 1128
of this section, no action thereafter shall be maintained by any 1129
other claimant against the state for or on account of the 1130
payment of the claim. 1131
(d) The director shall pay claims under division (I)(3)(b) 1132
of this section from the unclaimed funds trust fund and shall 1133
not seek reimbursement for such claims from the Ohio cultural 1134
and sports facility performance grant fund created under section 1135
123.282 of the Revised Code or deduct the amount of such claims 1136
from future remissions to that fund required by division (I)(4) 1137
of this section. 1138
(e) Any claim filed after the date the unclaimed funds and 1139
interest are deemed abandoned and escheat to the state and after 1140

H. B. No. 480 Page 40
As Introduced
January 1, 2036, is void. 1141
(4) On the first days of January and July each year, 1142
beginning in 2026, the director shall remit or cause to be 1143
remitted all unclaimed funds and interest that are deemed 1144
abandoned and escheat to the state to the state treasury to the 1145
credit of the Ohio cultural and sports facility performance 1146
grant fund created under section 123.282 of the Revised Code. 1147
The director shall notify the director of budget and management 1148
of all funds and interest remitted under this division. 1149
(5) If unclaimed funds and interest that are deemed 1150
abandoned and escheat to the state are retained or invested by a 1151
holder pursuant to an agreement under division (A) of section 1152
169.05 of the Revised Code, the director shall notify the holder 1153
and the holder shall pay the funds and interest to the director 1154
in a form and manner determined by the director. 1155
(6) The director of commerce shall develop guidelines and 1156
procedures to implement division (I) of this section including 1157
procedures addressing both of the following: 1158
(a) Repayment of unclaimed funds and interest that are 1159
invested in non-liquid assets; 1160
(b) Ensuring that the balance of the unclaimed funds trust 1161
fund is sufficient to meet the state's financial obligations 1162
under this chapter. 1163
Sec. 169.09. The director of commerce shall make adopt, in 1164
accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, necessary 1165
rules that prescribe uniform methods for conducting unclaimed 1166
funds audits under section 169.03 of the Revised Code and for 1167
determining when such an audit is appropriate, and may make 1168
adopt necessary rules to carry out any other duty imposed upon 1169

H. B. No. 480 Page 41
As Introduced
the director by this chapter. 1170
The director may liquidate and dispose of any intangible 1171
or tangible property the director receives in the course of 1172
administering this chapter that the director, following all 1173
reasonable efforts, is unable to return to the holder or owner. 1174
Any proceeds from the sale of the property shall be deposited 1175
into the unclaimed funds trust fund created in section 169.05 of 1176
the Revised Code and shall be treated as unclaimed funds. An 1177
unclaimed funds owner shall have no recourse against either the 1178
holder or the director for any gain or diminution in value after 1179
liquidation of any intangible or tangible property. 1180
Sec. 169.091. Within two years of the effective date of 1181
this section, the director of commerce shall cause to be created 1182
and maintained a method by which online reporting and claiming 1183
of unclaimed funds may be accomplished. 1184
Sec. 169.12. (A) Whoever knowingly violates No person 1185
shall fail to comply with section 169.03 of the Revised Code by 1186
failure failing to report unclaimed funds by the date prescribed 1187
therefor may be subject to a civil penalty of one hundred 1188
dollars per day. 1189
(B) Whoever violates No person shall fail to comply with 1190
section 169.03 of the Revised Code by failure failing to file an 1191
unclaimed funds report upon request within four months of the 1192
date of such request shall be subject to a civil penalty of one 1193
hundred dollars per day, which may be in addition to the other 1194
civil penalties provided for in this section. 1195
(C) No person shall fail to pay or deliver unclaimed funds 1196
to the director of commerce as required under section 169.05 of 1197
the Revised Code. 1198

H. B. No. 480 Page 42
As Introduced
(D) No person shall knowingly fail to perform any other 1199
duty required under this chapter. 1200
(E) Unclaimed funds not paid or made the subject of an 1201
agreement with to the director of commerce as provided in 1202
sections 169.03 and 169.05 of the Revised Code either because 1203
they were not reported or they were underreported or when 1204
reported were not paid or not made the subject of the required 1205
agreement shall have added thereto interest from the date 1206
prescribed for such payment or agreement until the date 1207
settlement is made. Such interest shall, if the holder is a 1208
financial institution, be the best available, nonnegotiable, 1209
retail time deposit base rate offered by that financial 1210
institution in the calendar year previous to the date of 1211
discovery of the violation, or if the holder is not a financial 1212
institution, be the best available six-month treasury bill rate 1213
offered in the calendar year previous to the date of discovery 1214
of violation. In addition, a civil penalty of one per cent of 1215
the amount of unclaimed funds not reported, underreported, or on 1216
which settlement has not been made shall be imposed for each 1217
month from the date prescribed for such reporting and payment or 1218
agreement until such required settlement is made, except that 1219
such penalty shall not be imposed for more than twenty-five 1220
months. 1221
(D) (F) In determining interest and penalties due in 1222
respect to intangible property, such property will be valued at 1223
the market value as of the date prescribed for reporting and 1224
payment in sections 169.03 and 169.05 of the Revised Code. If no 1225
market value is determinable, such property shall be valued as 1226
of the same date on the basis used by the department of 1227
taxation. 1228

H. B. No. 480 Page 43
As Introduced
(E) (G) If any person refuses to report or settle with the 1229
director as required under this chapter, the director may bring 1230
an action in the court having jurisdiction in the county where 1231
the holder resides or has his the holder's principal place of 1232
business or is engaged in business, to enforce such reporting or 1233
settlement requirements and to recover interest and penalties 1234
due. 1235
The director, for good cause shown, may waive part or all 1236
of the civil penalties provided for in fines imposed for a 1237
violation of this section for good cause shown and shall waive 1238
such civil penaltiesfines upon a showing that a holder had 1239
reasonable grounds for not complying with this chapter. 1240
Sec. 169.16. (A) No person, on behalf of any other person, 1241
shall engage in any activity for the purpose of locating, 1242
delivering, recovering, or assisting in the recovery of 1243
unclaimed funds or contents of a safe deposit box, and receive a 1244
fee, compensation, commission, or other remuneration for such 1245
activity, without first having obtained a certificate of 1246
registration from the director of commerce in accordance with 1247
this section. 1248
(B) An application for a certificate of registration shall 1249
be in writing and in the form prescribed by the director. The 1250
application shall be accompanied by notarized reference letters 1251
from two reputable witnesses. The application shall, at a 1252
minimum, provide all of the following: 1253
(1) The applicant's full name, home address, and work 1254
address; 1255
(2) The name, address, and telephone number of the two 1256
witnesses who have provided the reference letters; 1257

H. B. No. 480 Page 44
As Introduced
(3) A statement that the applicant has not, during the 1258
five-year period immediately preceding the submission of the 1259
application, violated division (A) of this section on or after 1260
the effective date of this section, or division (C) of section 1261
169.13 of the Revised Code; 1262
(4) A statement that the applicant has not been convicted 1263
of, or pleaded guilty to, any disqualifying offense as 1264
determined in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code; 1265
(5) The notarized signature of the applicant immediately 1266
following an acknowledgment that any false or perjured statement 1267
subjects the applicant to criminal liability under section 1268
2921.13 of the Revised Code. 1269
(C) Upon the filing of the application with the division 1270
of unclaimed funds, the division may investigate the applicant 1271
to verify the information provided in the application and to 1272
determine the applicant's eligibility for a certificate of 1273
registration under this section. False information on an 1274
application is grounds for the denial or revocation of the 1275
applicant's certificate of registration. 1276
(D)(1) Except as provided in division (D)(2) of this 1277
section, the director shall issue a certificate of registration 1278
to an applicant if the director finds that the following 1279
conditions are met: 1280
(a) The applicant has not, during the five-year period 1281
immediately preceding the submission of the application, 1282
violated division (A) of this section on or after the effective 1283
date of this section, or division (C) of section 169.13 of the 1284
Revised Code; 1285
(b) The applicant has not been convicted of, or pleaded 1286

H. B. No. 480 Page 45
As Introduced
guilty to, any disqualifying offense as determined in accordance 1287
with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. 1288
(c) The applicant's general fitness command the confidence 1289
of the public and warrant the belief that the applicant's 1290
business will be conducted honestly and fairly; 1291
(d) The applicant is a natural person. 1292
(2) The director shall issue a certificate of registration 1293
in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an 1294
applicant if either of the following applies: 1295
(a) The applicant holds a license or certificate of 1296
registration in another state. 1297
(b) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a 1298
government certification, or a private certification as 1299
described in that chapter in the same profession, occupation, or 1300
occupational activity as the profession, occupation, or 1301
occupational activity for which the certificate of registration 1302
is required in this state in a state that does not issue such a 1303
license or certificate of registration. 1304
(E) A certificate of registration may be renewed annually 1305
if the director finds that the following conditions are met: 1306
(1) The applicant submits a renewal application form 1307
prescribed by the director. 1308
(2) The applicant meets the conditions set forth in 1309
divisions (D)(1)(a) and (c) of this section. 1310
(3) The applicant has not, during the ten-year period 1311
immediately preceding the submission of the renewal application 1312
but excluding any time before the initial issuance of the 1313
certificate of registration, been convicted of, or pleaded 1314

H. B. No. 480 Page 46
As Introduced
guilty to, any felony or any offense involving moral turpitude, 1315
including theft, attempted theft, falsification, tampering with 1316
records, securing writings by deception, fraud, forgery, and 1317
perjury. 1318
(4) The applicant's certificate of registration is not 1319
subject to an order of revocation by the director. 1320
(F) A person seeking a certificate of registration 1321
pursuant to this section shall be a natural person who, on 1322
behalf of any other person, engages in any activity for the 1323
purpose of locating, delivering, recovering, or assisting in the 1324
recovery of unclaimed funds or the contents of a safe deposit 1325
box, and receives a fee, compensation, commission, or other 1326
remuneration for such activity. The person seeking a certificate 1327
of registration may be an attorney whose performance of services 1328
to locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the recovery of 1329
unclaimed funds or the contents of a safe deposit box is one of 1330
the primary purposes to the attorney's representation of the 1331
attorney's client. 1332
Sec. 169.18. Unless otherwise prohibited, upon request of 1333
the director of commerce, the state or a political subdivision 1334
shall make its books and records available to the director and 1335
cooperate with the director to determine the current address of 1336
an owner of unclaimed funds or an owner of intangible or 1337
tangible property described in section 169.09 of the Revised 1338
Code held by the director, for holder contact information, or to 1339
otherwise assist the director in the administration of this 1340
chapter. The director may enter into data sharing agreements to 1341
enable such other governmental agencies and political 1342
subdivisions to provide an additional notice to owners of 1343
unclaimed funds or owners of intangible or tangible property 1344

H. B. No. 480 Page 47
As Introduced
described in section 169.09 of the Revised Code held by the 1345
director. As used in this section, "political subdivision" and 1346
"state" have the same meanings as in section 2744.01 of the 1347
Revised Code. 1348
Sec. 169.19. (A) When an item owned by an individual who 1349
died a resident of this state has been reported to the director 1350
of commerce as unclaimed funds pursuant to this chapter, the 1351
director, not sooner than two hundred ten days after the death 1352
of the owner, shall distribute the item or pay the amount being 1353
held by the director, plus any interest due, pursuant to section 1354
169.08 of the Revised Code, without requiring letters 1355
testamentary or letters of administration to be issued upon the 1356
estate of the deceased owner where all the following conditions 1357
are met: 1358
(1) All such items of unclaimed funds taken together are 1359
valued at not more than one thousand dollars. 1360
(2) The person claiming the item is the surviving spouse, 1361
any one or more of the deceased owner's natural born or adopted 1362
children eighteen years of age or older, or the parent of the 1363
deceased owner, with preference given in that order. 1364
(3) The person seeking to claim the item provides the 1365
director all of the following: 1366
(a) A certified death certificate of the deceased owner; 1367
(b) The sworn affidavit described in division (A)(4) of 1368
this section under penalty of perjury; 1369
(c) Other information or documentary evidence the director 1370
determines necessary to distribute the property or pay funds 1371
under this section to the proper person. 1372

H. B. No. 480 Page 48
As Introduced
(4) The person seeking to claim the item under division 1373
(A) of this section presents to the director an affidavit 1374
requesting that the director release the item along with a list 1375
of all individual beneficiaries in the decedent's will or 1376
individuals who would inherit pursuant to section 2105.06 of the 1377
Revised Code if the decedent died intestate. The affidavit shall 1378
include all of the following information: 1379
(a) The deceased owner's name; 1380
(b) The date and place of the deceased owner's death; 1381
(c) A statement that more than two hundred ten days have 1382
passed since the deceased owner's death; 1383
(d) A statement that either: 1384
(i) An executor, administrator, or commissioner has not 1385
been appointed to administer the deceased owner's estate and no 1386
application for the appointment of an executor or administrator, 1387
or application to relieve an estate from administration, is 1388
pending in any jurisdiction. 1389
(ii) The executor, administrator, or commissioner has been 1390
discharged. 1391
(e) A description and dollar value of the item in the 1392
director's custody, not exceeding one thousand dollars to be 1393
paid, transferred, or delivered to the claimant; 1394
(f)(i) A statement that the deceased owner's funeral and 1395
burial expenses have been paid, that the claimant will pay the 1396
funeral and burial expenses, or that the unclaimed funds will be 1397
used to pay the funeral and burial expenses; 1398
(ii) If the statement in division (A)(4)(f)(i) of this 1399
section indicates that the unclaimed funds will be used to pay 1400

H. B. No. 480 Page 49
As Introduced
the funeral and burial expenses, an additional statement that if 1401
the unclaimed funds are in an amount sufficient to cover all 1402
unpaid funeral and burial expenses, the unclaimed funds will be 1403
used to cover all such expenses. If the unclaimed funds are 1404
insufficient to cover all such expenses, a statement that all 1405
the unclaimed funds will go toward the expenses. 1406
(g) A statement that the claimant is entitled to inherit 1407
from the deceased owner either by virtue of being a beneficiary 1408
in the decedent's will or under section 2105.06 of the Revised 1409
Code if the decedent died intestate, and that specifies the 1410
claimant's relationship to the deceased owner; 1411
(h) The following statement: "No other person has a 1412
superior right to the interest of the decedent in the described 1413
property." 1414
(i) A statement that the claimant requests that the item 1415
be paid, delivered, or transferred to the claimant; 1416
(j) A statement that the claimant will distribute the 1417
unclaimed funds pursuant to the deceased owner's will or section 1418
2105.06 of the Revised Code if the decedent died intestate; 1419
(k) The claimant's affirmation under penalty of perjury 1420
that the foregoing affidavit is true and correct. 1421
(B) If the director determines the claimant to be a person 1422
entitled to claim the item, the director shall distribute the 1423
item or pay the amount being held by the director. By this 1424
distribution or payment, the director shall be released to the 1425
same extent as by an entry granting release from administration 1426
or as if distribution or payment had been made to a duly 1427
appointed executor, administrator, or commissioner of the 1428
deceased owner's estate. The director shall not be required to 1429

H. B. No. 480 Page 50
As Introduced
oversee the application of the payment, delivery, or transfer 1430
made. 1431
(C) The payment, delivery, or transfer of the unclaimed 1432
funds due the deceased owner under this section is a full 1433
discharge and release to the director from any claim for the 1434
funds or property paid, delivered, or transferred. Any claimant 1435
to whom payment is made shall be liable to anyone prejudiced by 1436
an improper distribution, transfer, or payment. 1437
Sec. 169.20. (A) Notwithstanding any provision of section 1438
169.08 of the Revised Code to the contrary, the director of 1439
commerce shall create an expedited procedure to process an 1440
unclaimed funds claim as described in this section. 1441
(B) The expedited procedure shall be available only when 1442
the total value of all items of unclaimed funds in a person's 1443
claim are, taken together, valued at less than one thousand 1444
dollars. 1445
(C) For purposes of evaluating whether the person that 1446
submitted a claim pursuant to the expedited procedure has 1447
established the right to payment for unclaimed funds, both of 1448
the following apply: 1449
(1) The director shall not require the person to submit 1450
any notarized forms. 1451
(2) The director shall accept any of the following 1452
documents as proof that the claimant lived or did business at 1453
the owner's address that was reported to the director if the 1454
document contains the same address as the owner's reported 1455
address: 1456
(a) A utility bill; 1457

H. B. No. 480 Page 51
As Introduced
(b) A bank statement; 1458
(c) A paystub; 1459
(d) Electronic mail correspondence; 1460
(e) Any other document determined by the director. 1461
(D) The director shall adopt rules to implement this 1462
section. 1463
Sec. 169.99. (A) Whoever violates division (D) of section 1464
169.10 169.12 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than 1465
five hundred dollars. Each day of continuance of such violation 1466
is a separate offense. 1467
(B) Whoever violates division (C) of section 169.13 or 1468
division (A) of section 169.16 of the Revised Code is guilty of 1469
a misdemeanor of the first degree for a first offense and of a 1470
felony of the fifth degree for any subsequent offense. 1471
(C) Whoever negligently violates division (A), (B), or (C) 1472
of section 169.12 of the Revised Code shall be fined, for each 1473
month the violation occurs, not more than the lesser of five per 1474
cent of the value of the unclaimed funds or five thousand 1475
dollars. The total fines per violation shall not exceed the 1476
lesser of twenty-five per cent of the value of the unclaimed 1477
funds or five thousand dollars. 1478
(D) Whoever knowingly violates division (A), (B), or (C) 1479
of section 169.12 of the Revised Code shall be fined, for each 1480
month the violation occurs, not more than the lesser of five per 1481
cent of the value of the unclaimed funds or ten thousand 1482
dollars. The total fines per violation shall not exceed the 1483
lesser of fifty per cent of the value of the unclaimed funds or 1484
ten thousand dollars. 1485

H. B. No. 480 Page 52
As Introduced
(E) For purposes of this section, "the value of the 1486
unclaimed funds" means the market value as of the date 1487
prescribed for reporting and payment in sections 169.03 and 1488
169.05 of the Revised Code. If no market value is determinable, 1489
such property shall be valued as of the same date on the basis 1490
used by the department of taxation. "The value of the unclaimed 1491
funds" does not include interest under division (E) of section 1492
169.12 of the Revised Code. 1493
Sec. 5703.21. (A) Except as provided in divisions (B) and 1494
(C) of this section, no agent of the department of taxation, 1495
except in the agent's report to the department or when called on 1496
to testify in any court or proceeding, shall divulge any 1497
information acquired by the agent as to the transactions, 1498
property, or business of any person while acting or claiming to 1499
act under orders of the department. Whoever violates this 1500
provision shall thereafter be disqualified from acting as an 1501
officer or employee or in any other capacity under appointment 1502
or employment of the department. 1503
(B)(1) For purposes of an audit pursuant to section 117.15 1504
of the Revised Code, or an audit of the department pursuant to 1505
Chapter 117. of the Revised Code, or an audit, pursuant to that 1506
chapter, the objective of which is to express an opinion on a 1507
financial report or statement prepared or issued pursuant to 1508
division (A)(7) or (9) of section 126.21 of the Revised Code, 1509
the officers and employees of the auditor of state charged with 1510
conducting the audit shall have access to and the right to 1511
examine any state tax returns and state tax return information 1512
in the possession of the department to the extent that the 1513
access and examination are necessary for purposes of the audit. 1514
Any information acquired as the result of that access and 1515
examination shall not be divulged for any purpose other than as 1516

H. B. No. 480 Page 53
As Introduced
required for the audit or unless the officers and employees are 1517
required to testify in a court or proceeding under compulsion of 1518
legal process. Whoever violates this provision shall thereafter 1519
be disqualified from acting as an officer or employee or in any 1520
other capacity under appointment or employment of the auditor of 1521
state. 1522
(2) For purposes of an internal audit pursuant to section 1523
126.45 of the Revised Code, the officers and employees of the 1524
office of internal audit in the office of budget and management 1525
charged with directing the internal audit shall have access to 1526
and the right to examine any state tax returns and state tax 1527
return information in the possession of the department to the 1528
extent that the access and examination are necessary for 1529
purposes of the internal audit. Any information acquired as the 1530
result of that access and examination shall not be divulged for 1531
any purpose other than as required for the internal audit or 1532
unless the officers and employees are required to testify in a 1533
court or proceeding under compulsion of legal process. Whoever 1534
violates this provision shall thereafter be disqualified from 1535
acting as an officer or employee or in any other capacity under 1536
appointment or employment of the office of internal audit. 1537
(3) As provided by section 6103(d)(2) of the Internal 1538
Revenue Code, any federal tax returns or federal tax information 1539
that the department has acquired from the internal revenue 1540
service, through federal and state statutory authority, may be 1541
disclosed to the auditor of state or the office of internal 1542
audit solely for purposes of an audit of the department. 1543
(4) For purposes of Chapter 3739. of the Revised Code, an 1544
agent of the department of taxation may share information with 1545
the division of state fire marshal that the agent finds during 1546

H. B. No. 480 Page 54
As Introduced
the course of an investigation. 1547
(C) Division (A) of this section does not prohibit any of 1548
the following: 1549
(1) Divulging information contained in applications, 1550
complaints, and related documents filed with the department 1551
under section 5715.27 of the Revised Code or in applications 1552
filed with the department under section 5715.39 of the Revised 1553
Code; 1554
(2) Providing to the attorney general information the 1555
department obtains under division (J) of section 1346.01 of the 1556
Revised Code; 1557
(3) Permitting properly authorized officers, employees, or 1558
agents of a municipal corporation from inspecting reports or 1559
information pursuant to section 718.84 of the Revised Code or 1560
rules adopted under section 5745.16 of the Revised Code; 1561
(4) Providing information regarding the name, account 1562
number, or business address of a holder of a vendor's license 1563
issued pursuant to section 5739.17 of the Revised Code, a holder 1564
of a direct payment permit issued pursuant to section 5739.031 1565
of the Revised Code, or a seller having a use tax account 1566
maintained pursuant to section 5741.17 of the Revised Code, or 1567
information regarding the active or inactive status of a 1568
vendor's license, direct payment permit, or seller's use tax 1569
account; 1570
(5) Providing to a county auditor notices or documents 1571
concerning or affecting the taxable value of property in the 1572
county auditor's county. Unless authorized by law to disclose 1573
documents so provided, the county auditor shall not disclose 1574
such documents; 1575

H. B. No. 480 Page 55
As Introduced
(6) Providing to a county auditor a sales or use tax 1576
return or audit information under section 333.06 of the Revised 1577
Code; 1578
(7) Disclosing to a state or federal government agency, 1579
for use in the performance of that agency's official duties in 1580
this state, information in the possession of the tax 1581
commissioner necessary to verify compliance with any provision 1582
of the Revised Code or federal law relating to that agency. 1583
Unless disclosure is otherwise authorized by law, information 1584
provided to any state or federal government agency under this 1585
section remains confidential and is not subject to further 1586
disclosure; 1587
(8) Disclosing to a current or former employee, for use in 1588
preparation of the employee's income tax return, the account 1589
number issued by the tax commissioner to an employer for use in 1590
filing returns and making payments under section 5747.07 of the 1591
Revised Code. The commissioner may require the employee to 1592
provide evidence of current or past employment before such 1593
disclosure;. 1594
(9) Publishing or disclosing the amount of revenue 1595
distributed to a county, municipal corporation, township, school 1596
district, or any other political subdivision from any tax or 1597
fund administered by the tax commissioner; 1598
(10) Disclosing to a county auditor information in or 1599
discovered pursuant to the property tax relief screening system 1600
created in section 5703.83 of the Revised Code; 1601
(11) Disclosing to the director of commerce documents and 1602
information the director is authorized to receive under section 1603
169.18 of the Revised Code for the purpose of reuniting owners 1604

H. B. No. 480 Page 56
As Introduced
with their unclaimed property. 1605
Section 2. That existing sections 122.58, 169.01, 169.02, 1606
169.03, 169.05, 169.06, 169.07, 169.08, 169.09, 169.12, 169.16, 1607
169.99, and 5703.21 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 1608
Section 3. That section 169.10 of the Revised Code is 1609
hereby repealed. 1610
Section 4. Every holder that has been retaining an item of 1611
unclaimed funds pursuant to section 169.05 of the Revised Code, 1612
as that section existed prior to its amendment in this act, 1613
shall deliver each such item to the Director of Commerce not 1614
later than six months following the effective date of this 1615
section. 1616
Section 5. Section 169.16 of the Revised Code is presented 1617
in this act as a composite of the section as amended by both 1618
H.B. 509 and S.B. 131 of the 134th General Assembly. The General 1619
Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of 1620
section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be 1621
harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, 1622
finds that the composite is the resulting version of the section 1623
in effect prior to the effective date of the section as 1624
presented in this act. 1625